Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Procurement of Architectural and Engineering Services

45A.730.
Definitions for KRS 45A.730 to 45A.750.

As used in KRS

45A.730

to

45A.750

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Architectural services” means any professional service involved in the practice of architecture as defined in KRS

323.010

;

“Engineering services” means any professional service as defined in KRS 322.010(4) and (5);

“Firm” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity permitted by law to practice the profession of architecture or engineering and provide the services defined in subsections (1) and (2) of this section;

“Local public agency” shall have the same meaning given in KRS

45A.345

;

“Project” means any capital improvement project, study, plan, survey, or new or existing program activity of a political subdivision that requires architectural or professional engineering services;

“Qualification statement” means federal form SF254 and any other supporting documents that present a firm’s qualifications and performance data.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 249, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 214, § 44, effective January 1, 1999.

45A.735.
Authorization for local public agency to adopt KRS 45A.740, 45A.745, and 45A.750 — Effect of adoption — Qualification statements.

In the procurement of architectural and engineering services, each local public agency may adopt the provisions of KRS

45A.740

,

45A.745

, and

45A.750

. Upon adoption of these provisions, each local public agency shall:

Establish a monetary limit; and

Use the process set out in KRS

45A.740

,

45A.745

, and

45A.750

to procure architectural or engineering services for projects whose costs exceed this limit.

If any agency adopts the provisions of KRS

45A.740

,

45A.745

, and

45A.750

, then it shall accept qualification statements from firms engaged in the lawful practice of their professions. These qualification statements shall remain on file for one (1) year from the date they are submitted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 249, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

45A.740.
Procedures for proposed project requiring architectural or engineering services.

When a project requiring architectural or engineering services is proposed by a local public agency, except as provided by subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the agency shall:

Transmit a notice requesting a statement of interest in the proposed project from all firms that have a current qualifications statement on file;

Give adequate public notice of the proposed project, which may include posting on the Internet or newspaper advertisement, requesting firms to submit qualification statements and statements of interest in the proposed project; or

Contact an appropriate professional organization for a list of firms capable of providing the necessary services.

If the regulations of a federal department or agency require a procurement process that is different from the process in KRS

45A.730

to

45A.750

in order that financial aid can be granted, then the local government agency may exempt itself from the provisions of KRS

45A.730

to

45A.750

.

When a local public agency has formed a working relationship with one (1) or more firms based on work previously contracted between them, then the local public agency may enter directly into negotiations according to KRS

45A.750

. If no contract is successfully negotiated, then the local public agency shall comply with this section, KRS

45A.745

, and KRS

45A.750

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 249, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 120, § 18, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.745.
Criteria for evaluation of interested firms.

A local public agency shall evaluate those firms submitting statements of interest in a proposed project according to the following criteria:

Qualifications;

Ability of professional personnel;

Past record and experience;

Performance data on file;

Willingness to meet time and budget requirements;

Location;

Workload; and

Any other factors that the local public agency has set forth in writing, including the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required by KRS

45A.494

.

The local public agency may then conduct discussions and require interviews with firms deemed to be the most qualified according to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section. Bids for the cost of the proposed project shall not be a factor in the evaluation of firms until negotiations are begun in accordance with KRS

45A.750

.

The local public agency shall select, on the basis of the evaluations done in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, at least three (3) firms that are judged to be the most qualified and rank them accordingly. If fewer than three (3) firms are judged to be qualified, then those firms that remain shall be ranked in like manner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 249, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 162, § 16, effective July 15, 2010.

45A.750.
Negotiation of contract.

Based on the rankings developed in KRS 45A.745(3), the local public agency shall contact the highest-ranked firm and attempt to negotiate a contract for a fair and reasonable value that takes the following into account:

The estimated value of the services needed;

The scope and complexity of the proposed project;

The business risk anticipated; and

The professional nature of the services required.

If the local public agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the highest-ranked firm, negotiations with that firm shall be terminated. The local public agency shall then go through the negotiation process with the next firm in the rankings, continuing this procedure until an agreement is reached or the list of ranked firms is exhausted.

If negotiations with all of the ranked firms fail to result in a satisfactory contract, the local public agency shall reevaluate the architectural or engineering services involved in the proposed project and proceed to comply with KRS

45A.740

and

45A.745

until a contract is successfully negotiated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 249, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.